Utah statutes.
17B-2a-823.   Public transit district special services.

(1)  As used in this section, "bureau" means a recreational, tourist, or convention bureau established under Section 17-31-2.

(2) (a)  A public transit district may lease its buses to private certified public carriers or operate transit services requested by a public entity if a bureau certifies that privately owned carriers furnishing like services or operating like equipment within the area served by the bureau:

(i)  have declined to provide the service; or

(ii)  do not have the equipment necessary to provide the service.

(b)  A public transit district may lease its buses or operate services as authorized under Subsection (2)(a) outside of the area served by the district.

(3)  If part or all of the transportation services are paid for by public funds, a public transit district may:

(a)  provide school bus services for transportation of pupils and supervisory personnel between homes and school and other related school activities within the area served by the district; or

(b)  provide the transportation of passengers covered by a program within the district for people who are elderly or who have a disability.

(4)  Notwithstanding the provisions in Subsection (3), a municipality or county is not prohibited from providing the transportation services identified in Subsection (3).



Amended by Chapter 366, 2011 General Session

